Hawaii statutes.
[§329D-14] Prohibited acts related to
exceeding limits; fraud; penalties. (a) It shall be unlawful for any
person to obtain or attempt to procure any medical marijuana or medical
marijuana product by:

(1) Fraud,
deceit, misrepresentation, embezzlement, or theft;

(2) The
forgery or alteration of a medical marijuana permit;

(3) Furnishing
fraudulent medical information or the concealment of a material fact;

(4) The
use of a false name or patient identification number, or the giving of a false
address; or

(5) The
alteration of a state issued medical use of marijuana permit card.

(b) Any person who violates subsection (a) shall be
guilty of a class C felony. [L 2015, c 241, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next